Maryland, session 2025, SB0887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–201.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0887*

SENATE BILL 887
(a) (1) This section does not apply to Baltimore City.
(2) Subsections (b), (c), (d), and (f) of this section do not apply in Prince
George’s County.
(b) (1) The term of a county superintendent is 4 years beginning on July 1. A
county superintendent continues to serve until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(2) [By February 1 of the year in which a term ends, the county
superintendent shall notify the county board whether the superintendent is a candidate for
reappointment.
(3)] (I) [In] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
IN the year in which [a] AN INITIAL term begins, the county board shall appoint a county
superintendent between February 1 and June 30. [However, if the county board decides to
reappoint the incumbent superintendent, the county board shall take final action at a
public meeting no later than March 1 of that year.]
(II) AT ANY POINT DURING THE INCUMBENT
SUPERINTENDENT’S TERM, THE THE COUNTY BOARD MAY TAKE ACTION AT A PUBLIC
MEETING TO REAPPOINT THE INCUMBENT SUPERINTENDENT AT ANY TIME AFTER
THE END OF THE SECOND YEAR OF THE INCUMBENT SUPERINTENDENT’S TERM BUT
NOT LATER THAN MARCH 1 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH THE CONTRACT IS BEING
RENEWED TO REAPPOINT THE INCUMBENT SUPERINTENDENT TO SERVE A NEW
TERM OF 4 YEARS BEGINNING THE IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING JULY 1.
[(4)] (3) If a county board is unable to appoint a county superintendent
by July 1 of a year in which a term begins, the provisions of subsection (d) of this section
apply.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.